Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB143.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 395.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All fiduciaries required to execute a bond shall deliver to the clerk of the court of
the county in which he or she is appointed a bond payable to and with the
Commonwealth, subscribed to by the principal and sureties in the presence of a
notary, in the amount as may be approved by the court in the order of
appointment.
(2) The District Court shall not accept as surety, in any bond of a personal
representative, any master or other commissioner whose duty is to settle the
accounts of personal representatives, or any judge or clerk of a District Court or
practicing attorney of that court.
(3)[(2)] The bond shall be filed[subscribed by the principal and sureties, approved by
the court, attested by the clerk of the court and carefully kept] by the clerk in his or
her office in a record maintained[book to be provided] for that purpose.
Page 1 of 1
BR128900.100 - 1289 - XXXX 2/2/2026 4:37 PM Jacketed